Massachusetts, session 194th, H5519.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the bonds that the state
treasurer may issue pursuant to section 10 of chapter 100 of the acts of 2026 shall be issued for a
term not to exceed 30 years. All such bonds shall be payable not later than June 30, 2066, as
recommended by the governor in a message to the general court dated June 18, 2026 under
section 3 of Article LXII of the Amendments to the Constitution.
of 1